Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201768-981
Supplemental reimbursement; eligibility.

Participation in the supplemental reimbursement program by an eligible provider is voluntary. A provider is eligible for supplemental reimbursement only if the provider has all of the following characteristics continuously during a fiscal year of the state:

(1) Provides ground emergency medical transport services to medicaid beneficiaries;

(2) Is enrolled as a medicaid provider for the period being claimed;

(3) Is owned or operated by the state or a city, county, rural or suburban fire protection district, hospital district, federally recognized Indian tribe, or another unit of government; and

(4) Participates in the intergovernmental transfer program created pursuant to section 68-983.

Laws 2017, LB578, § 6.